District of Columbia statutes.
38-1208.05

Executive Director.

(a)

VEST shall be directed by an Executive Director who shall be appointed by the President of UDC, with the advice and consent of the Board of Trustees of UDC.

(b)

The Executive Director shall employ staff as needed, in accordance with annual appropriations.

Oct. 26, 1974, Pub. L. 93-471, title VIII, § 805
as added Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 2202, 49 DCR 6968